Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2308
Act; how construed; bonds; applicability of other provisions.

The Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act shall be independent of and in addition to any other provisions of the laws of the State of Nebraska or provisions of home rule charters, and bonds may be issued under the act for any purpose authorized in the act even though other provisions of the laws of the State of Nebraska or provisions of home rule charters may provide for the issuance of bonds for the same or similar purposes. The act shall not be considered amendatory of or limited by any other provisions of the laws of the State of Nebraska or provisions of home rule charters, and bonds may be issued under the act without complying with the restrictions or requirements of any other provisions of the laws of the State of Nebraska or without complying with the restrictions or requirements of home rule charters. Nothing in the act shall prohibit or limit the issuance of bonds in accordance with the provisions of other applicable laws of the State of Nebraska or of home rule charters if the governing body determines to issue such bonds under such other laws or charter, or otherwise limit the provisions of any home rule charter.

Laws 2005, LB 217, § 8.